dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
    <pardef n="ohm__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fia__n_un">
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bo__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="antimateri/a__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>an</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tropikerna__n_pl">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lam/a__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>or</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>aer</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>orna</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>aerna</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>an</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="histori/a__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>an</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dum/mer__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>mern</l><r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rar</l><r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>mar</l><r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rarna</l><r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>marna</l><r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>mer</l><r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="arbetsförmågeutrednin/g__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>g</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>gn</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>orna</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>or</l><r>g<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tank__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sen</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sarna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>arna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ar</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/oder__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>ödrarna</l><r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ödrar</l><r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>odern</l><r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oder</l><r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ham/mel__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>meln</l><r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>mel</l><r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>mlarna</l><r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>larna</l><r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>mlar</l><r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>lar</l><r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lexik/on__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>on</l><r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>onen</l><r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>on</l><r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>onet</l><r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="apokryferna"><i>apokryferna</i><par n="tropikerna__n_pl"/></e>
    <e lm="sago"><i>sago</i><par n="fia__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="ångestskri"><i>ångestskri</i><par n="bo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="konstruktionslexikon"><i>konstruktionslexik</i><par n="lexik/on__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="bildningsvärme"><i>bildningsvärme</i><par n="fia__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="jakthistoria"><i>jakthistori</i><par n="histori/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="albyl"><i>albyl</i><par n="ohm__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="cocktail"><i>cocktail</i><par n="tank__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="lexikon"><i>lexik</i><par n="lexik/on__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="småtimmarna"><i>småtimmarna</i><par n="tropikerna__n_pl"/></e>
    <e lm="patronymikon"><i>patronymik</i><par n="lexik/on__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="avvikelseprocent"><i>avvikelseprocent</i><par n="ohm__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kycklingmoder"><i>kycklingm</i><par n="m/oder__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="stammoder"><i>stamm</i><par n="m/oder__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="jordfly"><i>jordfly</i><par n="bo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="forward"><i>forward</i><par n="tank__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="förhistoria"><i>förhistori</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="distikon"><i>distik</i><par n="lexik/on__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="världshistoria"><i>världshistori</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="ankarfly"><i>ankarfly</i><par n="bo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="rimlexikon"><i>rimlexik</i><par n="lexik/on__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="laptopp"><i>laptopp</i><par n="tank__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="tropikerna"><i>tropikerna</i><par n="tropikerna__n_pl"/></e>
    <e lm="protoplasma"><i>protoplasma</i><par n="fia__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="konsthistoria"><i>konsthistori</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="framgångshistoria"><i>framgångshistori</i><par n="histori/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="tvistefrö"><i>tvistefrö</i><par n="bo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="släkthistoria"><i>släkthistori</i><par n="histori/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="milliwatt"><i>milliwatt</i><par n="ohm__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bobsleigh"><i>bobsleigh</i><par n="tank__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="associationslexikon"><i>associationslexik</i><par n="lexik/on__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="värme"><i>värme</i><par n="fia__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="lama"><i>lam</i><par n="lam/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="konversationslexikon"><i>konversationslexik</i><par n="lexik/on__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="antimateria"><i>antimateri</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="oldboy"><i>oldboy</i><par n="tank__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="Sjustjärnorna"><i>Sjustjärnorna</i><par n="tropikerna__n_pl"/></e>
    <e lm="sjustjärnorna"><i>sjustjärnorna</i><par n="tropikerna__n_pl"/></e>
    <e lm="situpp"><i>situpp</i><par n="tank__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="lämmel"><i>läm</i><par n="ham/mel__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="spenderbyxorna"><i>spenderbyxorna</i><par n="tropikerna__n_pl"/></e>
    <e lm="skepparhistoria"><i>skepparhistori</i><par n="histori/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="konkursbo"><i>konkursbo</i><par n="bo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="naturhistoria"><i>naturhistori</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="terawatt"><i>terawatt</i><par n="ohm__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="lymmel"><i>lym</i><par n="ham/mel__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="hammel"><i>ham</i><par n="ham/mel__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="halvmil"><i>halvmil</i><par n="ohm__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="linfrö"><i>linfrö</i><par n="bo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fjällämmel"><i>fjälläm</i><par n="ham/mel__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="arbetsförmågeutredning"><i>arbetsförmågeutrednin</i><par n="arbetsförmågeutrednin/g__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="polo"><i>polo</i><par n="fia__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="skimmel"><i>skim</i><par n="ham/mel__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kummel"><i>kum</i><par n="ham/mel__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="drummel"><i>drum</i><par n="ham/mel__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="litteraturhistoria"><i>litteraturhistori</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="lidandeshistoria"><i>lidandeshistori</i><par n="histori/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="millibar"><i>millibar</i><par n="ohm__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="moder"><i>m</i><par n="m/oder__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="anmoder"><i>anm</i><par n="m/oder__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="durra"><i>durra</i><par n="fia__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="groschen"><i>groschen</i><par n="ohm__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="naturalhistoria"><i>naturalhistori</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="historia"><i>histori</i><par n="histori/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="dummer"><i>dum</i><par n="dum/mer__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="happening"><i>happening</i><par n="tank__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="anskri"><i>anskri</i><par n="bo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="balkanländerna"><i>balkanländerna</i><par n="tropikerna__n_pl"/></e>
    <e lm="rövarhistoria"><i>rövarhistori</i><par n="histori/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="couronne"><i>couronne</i><par n="fia__n_un"/></e>
